Indiana, session 2026, HB1215.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 24-5-28.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 28.1. Regulation of Payment Card Networks
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "acquirer bank" means a
member of a payment card network that contracts with a
merchant, either directly or indirectly through a processor, for the
settlement of an electronic payment transaction.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "authorization" means the
process through which a merchant requests approval for an
electronic payment transaction from the issuer.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "bad faith" means conduct that:
(1) is fraudulent, willful, knowing, or intentional; and
(2) causes injury.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "charitable contribution" has the
meaning set forth in 26 U.S.C. 170(c), as in effect on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "clearance" means the process
2026 IN 1215—LS 6696/DI 154


of transmitting final transaction data from a merchant to an issuer
for posting to a person's account and the calculation of fees and
charges, including interchange fees, that apply to the issuer and the
merchant.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "covered credit card issuer"
means an issuer of a credit card that, at any point in time in the
previous calendar year, held consolidated worldwide banking and
nonbanking assets, including assets of affiliates other than trust
assets under management, in an amount greater than fifty billion
dollars ($50,000,000,000).
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "credit card" has the meaning
set forth in IC 24-5-27.5-3.
Sec. 8. As used in this chapter, "debit card" has the meaning set
forth in IC 24-5-27.5-4.
Sec. 9. As used in this chapter, "electronic payment transaction"
means a transaction in which a person uses a debit card, credit
card, or other payment code or device issued or approved through
a payment card network to debit a deposit account or use a line of
credit.
Sec. 10. As used in this chapter, "fee schedule" means a
schedule, list, table, chart, agreement, communication, or any other
document, whether publicly available or not, that sets forth the
amount of at least one (1) fee or a formula for determining at least
one (1) fee.
Sec. 11. As used in this chapter, "interchange fee" means a fee
established, charged, or received by a payment card network for
the purpose of compensating the issuer for the issuer's involvement
in an electronic payment transaction.
Sec. 12. As used in this chapter, "issuer" means a person that
issues a debit card or credit card or an agent of a person that issues
a debit card or credit card.
Sec. 13. As used in this chapter, "merchant" means a person
that accepts electronic payment transactions and collects and
remits a tax or regulatory fee.
Sec. 14. As used in this chapter, "payment card network" means
a person to which the following apply:
(1) The person, directly or through licensed members,
processors, or agents, provides the proprietary services,
infrastructure, and software to route information and data
for the purpose of conducting electronic payment transaction
authorization, clearance, and settlement.
(2) A merchant uses the person to accept as a form of
2026 IN 1215—LS 6696/DI 154


payment a brand of debit card, credit card, or other payment
code or device that may be used to carry out electronic
payment transactions.
Sec. 15. As used in this chapter, "person" means a natural
person, limited liability company, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government,
governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or
commercial entity.
Sec. 16. As used in this chapter, "processor" means a person
that facilitates, services, processes, or manages the debit or credit
authorization, billing, transfer, payment procedures, or settlement
with respect to any electronic payment transaction.
Sec. 17. As used in this chapter, "regulatory fee" means a fee,
assessment, or charge imposed by the state or a political
subdivision (as defined in IC 3-5-2.1-79).
Sec. 18. As used in this chapter, "settlement" means the process
of transmitting sales information to the issuer for collection and
reimbursement of funds to the merchant and calculating and
reporting the net transaction amount to the issuer and merchant
for a cleared electronic payment transaction.
Sec. 19. As used in this chapter, "tax" means any:
(1) use tax, including the use tax imposed under IC 6-2.5;
(2) sales tax, including the state gross retail tax imposed under
IC 6-2.5;
(3) occupation tax; or
(4) excise tax;
that is imposed by the state or a political subdivision (as defined in
IC 3-5-2.1-79).
Sec. 20. As used in this chapter, "transaction data" includes
information regarding:
(1) items purchased by a person;
(2) the price for each item;
(3) a taxability determination for each item;
(4) a segregated tax amount for each of the taxed items;
(5) a segregated regulatory fee amount applicable to the
transaction or to any item included in the transaction;
(6) the amount of cash or credit tendered;
(7) the net amount returned to the customer in change;
(8) the date and time of the purchase;
(9) the name, address, and identification number of the
vendor; and
(10) the receipt or invoice number of the transaction.
2026 IN 1215—LS 6696/DI 154


Sec. 21. A payment card network, whether directly or through
an agent, an acquirer bank, a processor, a contract, a requirement,
a condition, a technological specification, or an inducement, shall
not do any of the following:
(1) Fix or conspire to fix an interchange fee with, or on behalf
of, a covered credit card issuer or another payment card
network.
(2) Establish, put forward, or implement a fee schedule that
the payment card network knows, or reasonably should know,
has been used by a covered credit card issuer other than the
payment card network to determine the amount of an
interchange fee charged or received by the covered credit
card issuer in the current or previous calendar year.
(3) Establish, charge, or put forward on a fee schedule, an
interchange fee if the following apply:
(A) The fee is or includes a percentage multiplied by the
gross dollar amount of an electronic payment transaction.
(B) The fee does not exclude from the gross dollar amount
of the electronic payment transaction, any amount
attributable to a tax exempt product, tax, regulatory fee, or
gratuity associated with the electronic payment
transaction.
(4) Increase the rate or amount of fees that apply to an
electronic payment transaction other than on any amount
attributable to a tax, gratuity, or regulatory fee associated
with the electronic payment transaction.
(5) Require a merchant that accepts credit cards that are
enabled for processing over the payment card network to
accept all credit cards issued by a covered credit card issuer
that are enabled for processing over the payment card
network.
(6) Distribute, publish, or otherwise use transaction data from
an electronic payment transaction, except to do any of the
following:
(A) Process the electronic payment transaction.
(B) Monitor for, detect, or prevent fraud.
(C) Support loyalty programs, reward programs, or
promotional offers.
(D) Tailor products and services to serve the needs of
consumers.
(E) Comply with the laws of Indiana or federal law.
(7) Charge a fee to a person or merchant related to a disputed
2026 IN 1215—LS 6696/DI 154


transaction in which the person used a credit card, until:
(A) a determination as to whether the person or the
merchant is responsible for the disputed transaction has
been made; and
(B) the person or the merchant, whichever is determined
to be responsible for the disputed transaction under clause
(A), has been provided written notice of the determination.
(8) Penalize a merchant for setting prices in a manner that
complies with the laws of Indiana and federal law.
Sec. 22. A payment card network, whether directly or through
an agent, an acquirer bank, a processor, a contract, a requirement,
a condition, a technological specification, or an inducement, shall
not establish, put forward, or implement a fee schedule that the
payment network knows or reasonably should know has been used
by at least one (1) issuer other than the payment card network to
determine the amount of an interchange fee received or charged
with respect to a charitable contribution, unless the interchange fee
does not exceed either of the following:
(1) For a charitable contribution made by means of a debit
card, two-tenths of one percent (0.2%).
(2) For a charitable contribution made by means of a credit
card, three-tenths of one percent (0.3%).
Sec. 23. (a) A person that alleges damages arising from a
payment card network's violation of section 21 or 22 of this
chapter has a cause of action against the payment card network.
(b) A person that brings an action under this section may seek
any of the following forms of relief:
(1) The greatest of the following that are applicable:
(A) Actual damages, including prejudgment interest of
eight percent (8%) per year from the date the cause of
action accrued.
(B) Five hundred dollars ($500).
(C) Three (3) times the amount of actual damages
sustained by the person, if it is established by clear and
convincing evidence that the payment card network
engaged in bad faith.
(2) Reasonable attorney's fees and costs.
(c) If an action under this section is certified as a class action, a
plaintiff who prevails in an action under this section may:
(1) recover actual damages;
(2) be awarded injunctive relief; and
(3) may be awarded reasonable attorney's fees and costs.
2026 IN 1215—LS 6696/DI 154


(d) A person that brings an action under this section that is
found by a court of competent jurisdiction to be frivolous,
groundless, and in bad faith, or for the purpose of harassment, is
liable to the defendant for the costs of the action and reasonable
attorney's fees.
2026 IN 1215—LS 6696/DI 154